Utah, session 2026, SB88.
Section 1. Section 53G-7-1001 is amended to read:53G-7-1001. Definitions.ReservedAs used in this part, "public school" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53G-9-205.1.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53G-7-1003 is repealed and reenacted to read:53G-7-1003. Process and content standards for policy.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Parent-accessible monitoring system" means a technology platform that enables a parent to review the activity of the parent's student on school managed devices.(b)"Policy" means the elementary and secondary school online access policy adopted by a local school board to meet the requirements of Section 53G-7-1002.(c)"Preapproved content filtering system" means a method of internet access control that permits use only of the websites or online resources the local school board or school administrator preapproves.(2)(a)The local school board shall:(i)direct the development of each policy;(ii)adopt the policy in an open meeting;(iii)assign the policy an effective date;(iv)review the policy at least every three years;(v)add a footnote to the policy indicating the effective date of the last review; and(vi)post a notice of the policy's availability in a conspicuous place within each school.(b)The local school board may issue a public notice, separate from the notice required under Subsection (2)(a)(vi), if the school board considers issuing the notice appropriate.(3)The local school board shall ensure that the policy:(a)restricts access to internet or online sites that contain obscene material;(b)states how the local school board intends to meet the requirements of Section 53G-7-1002;(c)at the request of a student's parent, requires the use of a preapproved content filtering system when the student uses a school approved electronic device;(d)requires the use of a parent-accessible monitoring system;(e)informs the public that the school has adopted administrative procedures and guidelines for staff to follow in enforcing the policy;(f)informs the public that the school has adopted procedures to handle complaints about:(i)the policy;(ii)the enforcement of the policy; and(iii)observed behavior; and(g)states that the procedures described in Subsections (3)(e) and (f) are available for review at the school.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.